Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-1036
Nail technology establishment, defined.

Nail technology establishment means a nail technology salon, a mobile nail technology salon, a nail technology school, or any other place in which the practices of nail technology are performed on members of the general public for compensation or in which instruction or training in the practices of nail technology is given, except when such practices constitute nonvocational training.

Laws 1999, LB 68, § 11;

R.S.1943, (2003), § 71-361.03;

Laws 2007, LB463, § 298;

Laws 2018, LB731, § 11.